Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.100

Petitions—Paper—Size—Contents.

The person proposing the measure shall print blank petitions upon single sheets of paper of good writing quality (including but not limited to newsprint) not less than eleven inches in width and not less than fourteen inches in length. Each petition at the time of circulating, signing, and filing with the secretary of state must consist of not more than one sheet with numbered lines for not more than twenty signatures, with the prescribed warning and title, be in the form required by RCW 29A.72.110, 29A.72.120, or 29A.72.130, and have a readable, full, true, and correct copy of the proposed measure printed on the reverse side of the petition.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1811; 1982 c 116 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 118 s 4; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.080. Prior: (i) 1913 c 138 s 4, part; RRS s 5400, part. (ii) 1913 c 138 s 9; RRS s 5405. Formerly RCW 29.79.080.]